Missouri, session 2026, HB2278.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 167, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 167.795, to read as follows:
167.795. 1. For purposes of this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Activities association", any nonprofit statewide organization that satisfies
the following criteria:
(a) The organization facilitates interscholastic activities for secondary school
students, including, but not limited to, interscholastic athletic activities;
(b) More than fifty percent of the activities facilitated by the organization are
interscholastic athletic activities; and
(c) The organization's members include at least one public school or school
district that pays any fees to such association, including, but not limited to, activity
participation fees, tournament registration fees, membership fees, or any other fees or
payments relating to membership in the organization or participation in any activities
facilitated by the organization;
(d) The term "activities association" does not include organizations that do not
facilitate interscholastic athletic activities. Such organizations may include, but are not
limited to, career and technical student organizations, academic honor societies, service
organizations, leadership organizations, or other student clubs or organizations that do
not facilitate interscholastic athletic activities;
(2) "Department", the department of elementary and secondary education;
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HCS HBs 2278 & 2403 2
(3) "Public school", as defined in section 160.011. The term shall be construed to
include a charter school.
2. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, beginning in the 2027-
28 school year and continuing in all subsequent school years, appeals of decisions made
by an activities association may be heard by the "Interscholastic Athletic Activities
Appeals Board", which is hereby created and consists of a appeals board appointed by
the governor, by and with the advice and consent of the senate. The appeals board shall
consist of five members. The term of office of each member shall be four years, except
that of the initial appointed members, two members shall serve terms of two years and
three members shall serve terms of four years. At the expiration of the term of each
member, the governor, by and with the advice and consent of the senate, shall appoint a
successor. If the general assembly is not in session at the time for making an
appointment, the governor shall make a temporary appointment as in the case of a
vacancy.
3. The appeals board shall hear appeals after the activities association's appeals
process has been exhausted. If a decision on an appeal before the activities association is
needed within forty-eight hours, such appeal may be made directly to the appeals board.
In addition to hearing appeals in-person, the appeals board may hear an appeal
telephonically, through the use of video conferencing technology, or through any other
generally accepted means of remote communication. The appeals board shall hear only
the following appeals:
(1) Appeals relating to transfers of students deemed to be for athletic purposes;
(2) Appeals relating to contests and contest procedures; and
(3) Appeals relating to prior decisions made by an activities association that
resulted in the student's disqualification or prohibition from participating in any
athletic activities.
4. Any decision made by the appeals board shall be final and the activities
association shall abide by that decision.
5. The appeals board may make recommendations to an activities association for
rule changes to be voted on by the member schools of such association.
6. An activities association shall prepare an annual report and present to a house
committee to be chosen by the speaker of the house of representatives within the first
thirty days of the legislative session and a senate committee to be chosen by the
president pro tempore of the senate within the first thirty days of the legislative session.
7. The appeals board is established within the department of elementary and
secondary education for the purposes of hearing the appeals. The department shall
provide sufficient administrative and financial personnel to support the work of the

HCS HBs 2278 & 2403 3
appeals board, and shall promulgate rules concerning the timelines of each phase of the
appeals process.
8. If the appeals board is named as a defendant in any court action arising from
or relating to a decision of the appeals board, the attorney general shall represent the
appeals board and the state shall be responsible for all attorney's fees, costs, and
damages incurred.
9. The department shall promulgate rules as necessary to implement a fair and
timely appeals process, including timelines for each stage of an appeal to be heard by the
appeals board. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is defined in section 536.010,
that is created under the authority delegated in this section shall become effective only if
it complies with and is subject to all of the provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable,
section 536.028. This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and if any of the powers
vested with the general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the
effective date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently held unconstitutional,
then the grant of rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or adopted after August
28, 2026, shall be invalid and void.
✔